Alaska, session 34, HB105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 04 to read: 05 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature that the Board of Education 06 and Early Development develop guidelines for instruction in mental health in consultation 07 with the Department of Health, the Department of Family and Community Services, regional 08 tribal health organizations, and representatives of national and state mental health 09 organizations. 10 * Sec. 2. AS 14.03.016(a) is amended to read: 11 (a) A local school board shall, in consultation with parents, teachers, and 12 school administrators, adopt policies to promote the involvement of parents in the 13 school district's education program. The policies must include procedures 14 (1) recognizing the authority of a parent and allowing a parent to 15 object to and withdraw the child from a standards-based assessment or test required by 01 the state; 02 (2) recognizing the authority of a parent and allowing a parent to 03 object to and withdraw the child from an activity, class, or program; 04 (3) providing for parent notification not less than two weeks before 05 any activity, class, or program that includes content involving human reproduction or 06 sexual matters is provided to a child; 07 (4) recognizing the authority of a parent and allowing a parent to 08 withdraw the child from an activity, class, program, or standards-based assessment or 09 test required by the state for a religious holiday, as defined by the parent; 10 (5) providing a parent with an opportunity to review the content of an 11 activity, class, performance standard, or program; 12 (6) ensuring that, when a child is absent from an activity, class, 13 program, or standards-based assessment or test required by the state under this section, 14 the absence is not considered an unlawful absence under AS 14.30.020 if the child's 15 parent withdrew the child from the activity, class, program, or standards-based 16 assessment or test or gave permission for the child's absence; 17 (7) providing for parent notification not less than two weeks before 18 any class or program that provides instruction in mental health is provided to a 19 child. 20 * Sec. 3. AS 14.30.360(a) is amended to read: 21 (a) Each district in the state public school system shall be encouraged to 22 initiate and conduct a program in health education for kindergarten through grade 12. 23 The program should include instruction in [PHYSICAL] health and personal safety 24 including alcohol and drug abuse education, cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR), 25 early cancer prevention and detection, dental health, family health including infant 26 care, environmental health, mental health, physical health, the identification and 27 prevention of child abuse, child abduction, neglect, sexual abuse, and domestic 28 violence, and appropriate use of health services. 29 * Sec. 4. AS 14.30.360(b) is amended to read: 30 (b) The state board shall establish guidelines for a health and personal safety 31 education program, including guidelines for developmentally appropriate 01 instruction in mental health. In developing guidelines for developmentally 02 appropriate instruction in mental health, the state board shall consult with the 03 Department of Health, the Department of Family and Community Services, 04 regional tribal health organizations, and representatives of national and state 05 mental health organizations. Personal safety guidelines shall be developed in 06 consultation with the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault. Upon 07 request, the Department of Education and Early Development, the Department of 08 Health, the Department of Family and Community Services, and the Council on 09 Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault shall provide technical assistance to school 10 districts in the development of personal safety curricula. A school health education 11 specialist position shall be established and funded in the department to coordinate the 12 program statewide. Adequate funds to enable curriculum and resource development, 13 adequate consultation to school districts, and a program of teacher training in health 14 and personal safety education shall be provided. 15 * Sec. 5. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 16 read: 17 REPORT TO THE LEGISLATURE. Two years after the effective date of this Act, the 18 state Board of Education and Early Development shall submit a report to the senate secretary 19 and chief clerk of the house of representatives and notify the legislature that the report is 20 available. The report must 21 (1) include a copy of the guidelines for developmentally appropriate 22 instruction in mental health developed by the state Board of Education and Early 23 Development as required under AS 14.30.360(b), as amended by sec. 4 of this Act; and 24 (2) describe the process the state Board of Education and Early Development 25 used to develop the guidelines. 26 * Sec. 6. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 27 read: 28 TRANSITION. The state Board of Education and Early Development shall develop 29 the mental health guidelines required by AS 14.30.360(b), as amended by sec. 4 of this Act, 30 within two years after the effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.